bg-BG: Тип инсталация на дуплексера: Монтаж в долната тава; Вътрешен слот; Външно задно прикрепяне; Странично прикрепяне; Други
fr: Type d’installation de l’unité duplex: Montage sur bac inférieur; Emplacement interne; Fixation externe arrière; Fixation latérale; Autre
nl: Duplexer installatietype: Onderste lademontage; Interne sleuf; Externe bevestiging achter; Zijbevestiging; Andere
fi: Kaksipuolitusyksikkö asennustyyppi: Alalokeron kiinnitys; Sisäinen paikka; Takaosan ulkoinen kiinnitys; Sivukiinnitys; Muu
pl: Typ instalacji dupleksera: Montaż w dolnej tacy; Wewnętrzne gniazdo; Mocowanie zewnętrzne z tyłu; Mocowanie boczne; Inne
zh-TW: 雙面列印器安裝類型: 底部紙匣安裝; 內部插槽; 後部外接; 側面安裝; 其他
da: Duplexer-installationstype: Bund bakke montering; Internt slot; Bageste eksterne tilslutning; Sidetilslutning; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta ugradnje uređaja za obostrani ispis: Montaža na donju ladicu; Interni utor; Stražnji vanjski priključak; Bočni priključak; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do duplexador: Montagem em tabuleiro inferior; Ranhura interna; Fixação externa traseira; Fixação lateral; Outro
en: Duplexer installation type: Bottom tray mount; Internal slot; Rear external attachment; Side attachment; Other
es: Tipo de instalación del duplexor: Montaje en bandeja inferior; Ranura interna; Accesorio externo posterior; Accesorio lateral; Otros
ro-RO: Tip instalare duplexer: Montare tavă inferioară; Slot intern; Atașament extern posterior; Atașament lateral; Altele
cs: Typ instalace duplexu: Montáž do spodního zásobníku; Interní slot; Zadní externí připojení; Boční připojení; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ inštalácie duplexera: Montáž na spodný zásobník; Interný slot; Zadné externé pripojenie; Bočné pripojenie; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de instalação do duplexador: Montagem em bandeja inferior; Slot interno; Fixação externa traseira; Fixação lateral; Outro
ru: Тип установки компонента двусторонней печати: Крепление к нижнему лотку; Внутренний слот; Заднее внешнее крепление; Боковое крепление; Другой
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งดูเพล็กซ์เซอร์: ติดตั้งถาดล่าง; ช่องภายใน; ติดภายนอกด้านหลัง; ติดด้านข้าง; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης μονάδας διπλής όψης: Στήριγμα κάτω δίσκου; Εσωτερική υποδοχή; Πίσω εξωτερική προσάρτηση; Πλευρική προσάρτηση; Άλλο
zh-CN: 双面器安装类型: 底部纸盘安装; 内部插槽; 后部外置附件; 侧面附件; 其他
hu: Duplexertelepítési típus: Alsó tálca rögzítés; Belső nyílás; Hátsó külső csatlakozás; Oldalsó csatlakozás; Egyéb
sv: Duplexenhetsinstallationstyp: Bottenfacksmontering; Intern plats; Bakre extern montering; Sidomontering; Övrigt
sl-SI: Tip namestitve enote za obojestransko tiskanje: Pritrditev na spodnji pladenj; Notranja reža; Zadnja zunanja pritrditev; Stranska pritrditev; Drugo
ko: 양면 인쇄 장치 설치 유형: 하단 트레이 장착; 내부 슬롯; 후면 외부 부착; 측면 부착; 기타
vi: Loại lắp đặt bộ in hai mặt: Gắn khay dưới; Khe nội bộ; Gắn ngoài phía sau; Gắn bên hông; Khác
tr: Dubleks kurulum tipi: Alt tepsi montajı; Dahili yuva; Arka harici bağlantı; Yan bağlantı; Diğer
lt-LT: Dvipusio spausdinimo įrenginio montavimo tipas: Apatinio dėklo tvirtinimas; Vidinis lizdas; Galinis išorinis priedas; Šoninis priedas; Kita
de: Montageart des Duplexers: Untere Fachmontage; Interner Steckplatz; Hinterer externer Anbau; Seitlicher Anbau; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di installazione duplexer: Montaggio vassoio inferiore; Slot interno; Attacco esterno posteriore; Attacco laterale; Altro
nb: Installasjonstype for dupleksenhet: Bunnskuffmontering; Internt spor; Bakre eksternt tilbehør; Sidetilbehør; Annet
ja: デュプレクサー取り付けタイプ: ボトムトレイマウント; 内部スロット; 背面外部取り付け; 側面取り付け; その他